lib/dict/hyph_lv_LV.dic
2b3da3mies.
2c3da3mies.
2è3da3mies.
2d3da3mies.
2f3da3mies.
2g3da3mies.
2ì3da3mies.
2h3da3mies.
2j3da3mies.
2k3da3mies.
2í3da3mies.
2l3da3mies.
2ï3da3mies.
2m3da3mies.
2n3da3mies.
2ò3da3mies.
2p3da3mies.
2r3da3mies.
2s3da3mies.
2ð3da3mies.
2t3da3mies.
2v3da3mies.
2z3da3mies.
2þ3da3mies.
2b3da3mâs.
2c3da3mâs.
2è3da3mâs.
2d3da3mâs.
2f3da3mâs.
2g3da3mâs.
2ì3da3mâs.
2h3da3mâs.
2j3da3mâs.
2k3da3mâs.
2í3da3mâs.
2l3da3mâs.
2ï3da3mâs.
2m3da3mâs.
2n3da3mâs.
2ò3da3mâs.
2p3da3mâs.
2r3da3mâs.
2s3da3mâs.
2ð3da3mâs.
2t3da3mâs.
2v3da3mâs.
2z3da3mâs.
2þ3da3mâs.
2b3gans.
2c3gans.
2è3gans.
2d3gans.
2f3gans.
2g3gans.
2ì3gans.
2h3gans.
2j3gans.
2k3gans.
2í3gans.
2l3gans.
2ï3gans.
2m3gans.
2n3gans.
2ò3gans.
2p3gans.
2r3gans.
2s3gans.
2ð3gans.
2t3gans.
2v3gans.
2z3gans.
2þ3gans.
2b3ga3na.
2c3ga3na.
2è3ga3na.
2d3ga3na.
2f3ga3na.
2g3ga3na.
2ì3ga3na.
2h3ga3na.
2j3ga3na.
2k3ga3na.
2í3ga3na.
2l3ga3na.
2ï3ga3na.
2m3ga3na.
2n3ga3na.
2ò3ga3na.
2p3ga3na.
2r3ga3na.
2s3ga3na.
2ð3ga3na.
2t3ga3na.
2v3ga3na.
2z3ga3na.
2þ3ga3na.
2b3nieks.
2c3nieks.
2è3nieks.
2d3nieks.
2f3nieks.
2g3nieks.
2ì3nieks.
2h3nieks.
2j3nieks.
2k3nieks.
2í3nieks.
2l3nieks.
2ï3nieks.
2m3nieks.
2n3nieks.
2ò3nieks.
2p3nieks.
2r3nieks.
2s3nieks.
2ð3nieks.
2t3nieks.
2v3nieks.
2z3nieks.
2þ3nieks.
2b3nie3ce.
2c3nie3ce.
2è3nie3ce.
2d3nie3ce.
2f3nie3ce.
2g3nie3ce.
2ì3nie3ce.
2h3nie3ce.
2j3nie3ce.
2k3nie3ce.
2í3nie3ce.
2l3nie3ce.
2ï3nie3ce.
2m3nie3ce.
2n3nie3ce.
2ò3nie3ce.
2p3nie3ce.
2r3nie3ce.
2s3nie3ce.
2ð3nie3ce.
2t3nie3ce.
2v3nie3ce.
2z3nie3ce.
2þ3nie3ce.
2b3nî3ca.
2c3nî3ca.
2è3nî3ca.
2d3nî3ca.
2f3nî3ca.
2g3nî3ca.
2ì3nî3ca.
2h3nî3ca.
2j3nî3ca.
2k3nî3ca.
2í3nî3ca.
2l3nî3ca.
2ï3nî3ca.
2m3nî3ca.
2n3nî3ca.
2ò3nî3ca.
2p3nî3ca.
2r3nî3ca.
2s3nî3ca.
2ð3nî3ca.
2t3nî3ca.
2v3nî3ca.
2z3nî3ca.
2þ3nî3ca.
2b3ða3na.
2c3ða3na.
2è3ða3na.
2d3ða3na.
2f3ða3na.
2g3ða3na.
2ì3ða3na.
2h3ða3na.
2j3ða3na.
2k3ða3na.
2í3ða3na.
2l3ða3na.
2ï3ða3na.
2m3ða3na.
2n3ða3na.
2ò3ða3na.
2p3ða3na.
2r3ða3na.
2s3ða3na.
2ð3ða3na.
2t3ða3na.
2v3ða3na.
2z3ða3na.
2þ3ða3na.
2b3ða3nâs.
2c3ða3nâs.
2è3ða3nâs.
2d3ða3nâs.
2f3ða3nâs.
2g3ða3nâs.
2ì3ða3nâs.
2h3ða3nâs.
2j3ða3nâs.
2k3ða3nâs.
2í3ða3nâs.
2l3ða3nâs.
2ï3ða3nâs.
2m3ða3nâs.
2n3ða3nâs.
2ò3ða3nâs.
2p3ða3nâs.
2r3ða3nâs.
2s3ða3nâs.
2ð3ða3nâs.
2t3ða3nâs.
2v3ða3nâs.
2z3ða3nâs.
2þ3ða3nâs.
2b3ta3la.
2c3ta3la.
2è3ta3la.
2d3ta3la.
2f3ta3la.
2g3ta3la.
2ì3ta3la.
2h3ta3la.
2j3ta3la.
2k3ta3la.
2í3ta3la.
2l3ta3la.
2ï3ta3la.
2m3ta3la.
2n3ta3la.
2ò3ta3la.
2p3ta3la.
2r3ta3la.
2s3ta3la.
2ð3ta3la.
2t3ta3la.
2v3ta3la.
2z3ta3la.
2þ3ta3la.
2b3tu3ve.
2c3tu3ve.
2è3tu3ve.
2d3tu3ve.
2f3tu3ve.
2g3tu3ve.
2ì3tu3ve.
2h3tu3ve.
2j3tu3ve.
2k3tu3ve.
2í3tu3ve.
2l3tu3ve.
2ï3tu3ve.
2m3tu3ve.
2n3tu3ve.
2ò3tu3ve.
2p3tu3ve.
2r3tu3ve.
2s3tu3ve.
2ð3tu3ve.
2t3tu3ve.
2v3tu3ve.
2z3tu3ve.
2þ3tu3ve.
2b3dams.
2c3dams.
2è3dams.
2d3dams.
2f3dams.
2g3dams.
2ì3dams.
2h3dams.
2j3dams.
2k3dams.
2í3dams.
2l3dams.
2ï3dams.
2m3dams.
2n3dams.
2ò3dams.
2p3dams.
2r3dams.
2s3dams.
2ð3dams.
2t3dams.
2v3dams.
2z3dams.
2þ3dams.
2b3da3ma.
2c3da3ma.
2è3da3ma.
2d3da3ma.
2f3da3ma.
2g3da3ma.
2ì3da3ma.
2h3da3ma.
2j3da3ma.
2k3da3ma.
2í3da3ma.
2l3da3ma.
2ï3da3ma.
2m3da3ma.
2n3da3ma.
2ò3da3ma.
2p3da3ma.
2r3da3ma.
2s3da3ma.
2ð3da3ma.
2t3da3ma.
2v3da3ma.
2z3da3ma.
2þ3da3ma.
2b3da3mies.
2c3da3mies.
2è3da3mies.
2d3da3mies.
2f3da3mies.
2g3da3mies.
2ì3da3mies.
2h3da3mies.
2j3da3mies.
2k3da3mies.
2í3da3mies.
2l3da3mies.
2ï3da3mies.
2m3da3mies.
2n3da3mies.
2ò3da3mies.
2p3da3mies.
2r3da3mies.
2s3da3mies.
2ð3da3mies.
2t3da3mies.
2v3da3mies.
2z3da3mies.
2þ3da3mies.
2b3da3mâs.
2c3da3mâs.
2è3da3mâs.
2d3da3mâs.
2f3da3mâs.
2g3da3mâs.
2ì3da3mâs.
2h3da3mâs.
2j3da3mâs.
2k3da3mâs.
2í3da3mâs.
2l3da3mâs.
2ï3da3mâs.
2m3da3mâs.
2n3da3mâs.
2ò3da3mâs.
2p3da3mâs.
2r3da3mâs.
2s3da3mâs.
2ð3da3mâs.
2t3da3mâs.
2v3da3mâs.
2z3da3mâs.
2þ3da3mâs.
2b3gans.
2c3gans.
2è3gans.
2d3gans.
2f3gans.
2g3gans.
2ì3gans.
2h3gans.
2j3gans.
2k3gans.
2í3gans.
2l3gans.
2ï3gans.
2m3gans.
2n3gans.
2ò3gans.
2p3gans.
2r3gans.
2s3gans.
2ð3gans.
2t3gans.
2v3gans.
2z3gans.
2þ3gans.
2b3ga3na.
2c3ga3na.
2è3ga3na.
2d3ga3na.
2f3ga3na.
2g3ga3na.
2ì3ga3na.
2h3ga3na.
2j3ga3na.
2k3ga3na.
2í3ga3na.
2l3ga3na.
2ï3ga3na.
2m3ga3na.
2n3ga3na.
2ò3ga3na.
2p3ga3na.
2r3ga3na.
2s3ga3na.
2ð3ga3na.
2t3ga3na.
2v3ga3na.
2z3ga3na.
2þ3ga3na.
2b3nieks.
2c3nieks.
2è3nieks.
2d3nieks.
2f3nieks.
2g3nieks.
2ì3nieks.
2h3nieks.
2j3nieks.
2k3nieks.
2í3nieks.
2l3nieks.
2ï3nieks.
2m3nieks.
2n3nieks.
2ò3nieks.
2p3nieks.
2r3nieks.
2s3nieks.
2ð3nieks.
2t3nieks.
2v3nieks.
2z3nieks.
2þ3nieks.
2b3nie3ce.
2c3nie3ce.
2è3nie3ce.
2d3nie3ce.
2f3nie3ce.
2g3nie3ce.
2ì3nie3ce.
2h3nie3ce.
2j3nie3ce.
2k3nie3ce.
2í3nie3ce.
2l3nie3ce.
2ï3nie3ce.
2m3nie3ce.
2n3nie3ce.
2ò3nie3ce.
2p3nie3ce.
2r3nie3ce.
2s3nie3ce.
2ð3nie3ce.
2t3nie3ce.
2v3nie3ce.
2z3nie3ce.
2þ3nie3ce.
2b3nî3ca.
2c3nî3ca.
2è3nî3ca.
2d3nî3ca.
2f3nî3ca.
2g3nî3ca.
2ì3nî3ca.
2h3nî3ca.
2j3nî3ca.
2k3nî3ca.
2í3nî3ca.
2l3nî3ca.
2ï3nî3ca.
2m3nî3ca.
2n3nî3ca.
2ò3nî3ca.
2p3nî3ca.
2r3nî3ca.
2s3nî3ca.
2ð3nî3ca.
2t3nî3ca.
2v3nî3ca.
2z3nî3ca.
2þ3nî3ca.
2b3ða3na.
2c3ða3na.
2è3ða3na.
2d3ða3na.
2f3ða3na.
2g3ða3na.
2ì3ða3na.
2h3ða3na.
2j3ða3na.
2k3ða3na.
2í3ða3na.
2l3ða3na.
2ï3ða3na.
2m3ða3na.
2n3ða3na.
2ò3ða3na.
2p3ða3na.
2r3ða3na.
2s3ða3na.
2ð3ða3na.
2t3ða3na.
2v3ða3na.
2z3ða3na.
2þ3ða3na.
2b3ða3nâs.
2c3ða3nâs.
2è3ða3nâs.
2d3ða3nâs.
2f3ða3nâs.
2g3ða3nâs.
2ì3ða3nâs.
2h3ða3nâs.
2j3ða3nâs.
2k3ða3nâs.
2í3ða3nâs.
2l3ða3nâs.
2ï3ða3nâs.
2m3ða3nâs.
2n3ða3nâs.
2ò3ða3nâs.
2p3ða3nâs.
2r3ða3nâs.
2s3ða3nâs.
2ð3ða3nâs.
2t3ða3nâs.
2v3ða3nâs.
2z3ða3nâs.
2þ3ða3nâs.
2b3ta3la.
2c3ta3la.
2è3ta3la.
2d3ta3la.
2f3ta3la.
2g3ta3la.
2ì3ta3la.
2h3ta3la.
2j3ta3la.
2k3ta3la.
2í3ta3la.
2l3ta3la.
2ï3ta3la.
2m3ta3la.
2n3ta3la.
2ò3ta3la.
2p3ta3la.
2r3ta3la.
2s3ta3la.
2ð3ta3la.
2t3ta3la.
2v3ta3la.
2z3ta3la.
2þ3ta3la.
2b3tu3ve.
2c3tu3ve.
2è3tu3ve.
2d3tu3ve.
2f3tu3ve.
2g3tu3ve.
2ì3tu3ve.
2h3tu3ve.
2j3tu3ve.
2k3tu3ve.
2í3tu3ve.
2l3tu3ve.
2ï3tu3ve.
2m3tu3ve.
2n3tu3ve.
2ò3tu3ve.
2p3tu3ve.
2r3tu3ve.
2s3tu3ve.
2ð3tu3ve.
2t3tu3ve.
2v3tu3ve.
2z3tu3ve.
2þ3tu3ve.
.jâ3a2
.ne3a2
.ie3a2
.no3a2
.pa3a2
.pie3a2
.sa3a2
.uz3a2
.aiz3a2
.ap3a2
.at3a2
.bez3a2
.pâr3a2
.iz3a2
.eks3a2
.vis3a2
.jâ3â2
.ne3â2
.ie3â2
.no3â2
.pa3â2
.pie3â2
.sa3â2
.uz3â2
.aiz3â2
.ap3â2
.at3â2
.bez3â2
.pâr3â2
.iz3â2
.eks3â2
.vis3â2
.jâ3e2
.ne3e2
.ie3e2
.no3e2
.pa3e2
.pie3e2
.sa3e2
.uz3e2
.aiz3e2
.ap3e2
.at3e2
.bez3e2
.pâr3e2
.iz3e2
.eks3e2
.vis3e2
.jâ3ç2
.ne3ç2
.ie3ç2
.no3ç2
.pa3ç2
.pie3ç2
.sa3ç2
.uz3ç2
.aiz3ç2
.ap3ç2
.at3ç2
.bez3ç2
.pâr3ç2
.iz3ç2
.eks3ç2
.vis3ç2
.jâ3i2
.ne3i2
.ie3i2
.no3i2
.pa3i2
.pie3i2
.sa3i2
.uz3i2
.aiz3i2
.ap3i2
.at3i2
.bez3i2
.pâr3i2
.iz3i2
.eks3i2
.vis3i2
.jâ3î2
.ne3î2
.ie3î2
.no3î2
.pa3î2
.pie3î2
.sa3î2
.uz3î2
.aiz3î2
.ap3î2
.at3î2
.bez3î2
.pâr3î2
.iz3î2
.eks3î2
.vis3î2
.jâ3o2
.ne3o2
.ie3o2
.no3o2
.pa3o2
.pie3o2
.sa3o2
.uz3o2
.aiz3o2
.ap3o2
.at3o2
.bez3o2
.pâr3o2
.iz3o2
.eks3o2
.vis3o2
.jâ3u2
.ne3u2
.ie3u2
.no3u2
.pa3u2
.pie3u2
.sa3u2
.uz3u2
.aiz3u2
.ap3u2
.at3u2
.bez3u2
.pâr3u2
.iz3u2
.eks3u2
.vis3u2
.jâ3û2
.ne3û2
.ie3û2
.no3û2
.pa3û2
.pie3û2
.sa3û2
.uz3û2
.aiz3û2
.ap3û2
.at3û2
.bez3û2
.pâr3û2
.iz3û2
.eks3û2
.vis3û2
.jâ3ie1
.jâ3iz1
.jâ3no1
.ne3aiz1
.ne3ap1
.ne3ie1
.ne3at1
.ne3in1
.ne3iz1
.ne3sa
.ne3uz1
.sa2u
.sa2i
.sa2i
.sa2i
.priek2ð1
4d5ze1me
.tur2p1m
il2k1tie
.spil2g1t
mç1ne2ð1
1pa1d2smit
g2ð1gal
k2ð1gal
tran2s
1port
vçs2t1n
vçs2t1k
pa2t3stâ
pa2s2t3k
pa2s2t3m
pa2s2t2s.
pa2r2k2s.
pa2r3ket
sa2ls.
sa2lds.
sa2l2d1
pir2m1r
pir2m1k
pir2m2s1
ot2r1r2
ot2r1k2
ir2k3l
ir2k3ï
.adâ2m3
.ai4z5
ak3me4ò3
apak2ð3
ap1au
kâr2t3n
aug2s2t3
.at3e2j
bal2t3ma
.vie2n1
